Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.055

Reduction of sentences during war emergency.

The indeterminate sentence review board is hereby granted authority, in the event of a declaration by the governor that a war emergency exists, including a general mobilization, and for the duration thereof only, to reduce downward the minimum term, as set by the board, of any inmate under the jurisdiction of the board confined in a state correctional facility, who will be accepted by and inducted into the armed services: PROVIDED, That a reduction downward shall not be made under this section for those inmates who: (1) Are confined for (a) treason; (b) murder in the first degree; or (c) rape of a child in the first degree where the victim is under ten years of age or an equivalent offense under prior law; (2) are being considered for civil commitment as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW; or (3) were sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 for a crime committed on or after September 1, 2001.

[ 2009 c 28 s 23; 2003 c 218 s 3; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 325; 1992 c 7 s 25; 1951 c 239 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.